Oklahoma, session 2025, SB654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-101.1, as


last amended by Section 17, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (26 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 14-101.1), is amended to read as follows:


Section 14-101.1. A. For the purposes of this section,


“absentee ballot harvesting” means:


1. Collecting or obtaining an absentee ballot from another


person with the intent to submit, transmit or return the ballot to


election officials on behalf of that person;


2. Submitting, returning or transmitting an absentee ballot to


election officials on behalf of another person;

Req. No. 303 Page 1


3. Collecting or obtaining an absentee ballot from another


person under a false pretense or promise of transmitting, returning


or submitting it to election officials on behalf of that person;


4. Requesting or receiving an absentee ballot on behalf of


another person; or


5. Distributing an absentee ballot application or request to a


voter using the official letterhead of a candidate or elected


official;


6. Partially or fully completing an application for an absentee


ballot on behalf of another person without that person’s prior


consent; or


7. Notarizing or witnessing more absentee ballots than allowed


by law.


B. Absentee ballot harvesting shall be unlawful at any election


conducted by a county election board, the State Election Board or


any political subdivision of this state; provided, the following


shall not be deemed to be ballot harvesting:


1. A voter’s assistant or agent acting pursuant to law as


otherwise allowed by this title;


2. An absentee voting board member, as described in this title,


who assists a voter confined to a nursing home or State Veterans


Home pursuant to law;


3. An employee of the Federal Voting Assistance Program, the


United States Department of Defense or the Oklahoma National Guard

Req. No. 303 Page 2


who assists a uniformed-services voter in returning or transmitting


an absentee ballot;


4. A spouse, relative in the first or second degree of


consanguinity or affinity or cohabitant of a voter who forwards an


absentee ballot to the voter when absent from the home;


5. A voter’s spouse who, with the voter’s consent, returns the


voter’s absentee ballot by mail; or


6. An official action by an election official that is required


or authorized by law.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 14-108.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 14-108.1. A. Neither a notary public nor an agent


working on behalf of a notary public shall be authorized to:


1. Request absentee ballots on behalf of a voter other than


himself or herself;


2. Assist a voter in requesting absentee ballots, other than


for himself or herself or a member of his or her household;


3. Receive by mail an absentee ballot on behalf of a voter,


other than for himself or herself or a member of his or her


household; or


4. Submit a completed absentee ballot on behalf of a voter


other than for himself or herself.





Req. No. 303 Page 3


B. A notary public shall maintain a log of all absentee ballot


affidavits that he or she notarizes for a period of at least two (2)


years after the date of the election.


C. 1. A notary public shall be authorized to notarize a


maximum of twenty absentee ballot affidavits for a single election,


except as provided in paragraphs 2 and 3 of this subsection.


2. A notary public may be authorized to notarize more than


twenty absentee ballot affidavits at a single election with the


written approval of the secretary of the county election board.


Such approval shall apply for affidavits notarized within the county


served by the county election board secretary.


3. The limitation required by this subsection shall not apply


to the notarizing of absentee ballot affidavits at the place of


business of a notary public that is open to the general public


during the normal business hours of the notary public.


D. 1. If more than ten absentee ballots for a single election


are requested to be mailed to a single mailing address, the


secretary of the county election board shall immediately notify the


district attorney for that county and the Secretary of the State


Election Board.


2. Upon receipt of such notification, the district attorney, or


a member of law enforcement designated by the district attorney,


shall investigate any possible criminal violation of the law related


to the absentee ballot requests.

Req. No. 303 Page 4


3. Provided, this notification requirement shall not apply to


requests for absentee ballots to be sent to the addresses of nursing


homes, veterans centers, medical facilities, multiunit housing,


installations of the Armed Forces of the United States where


uniformed or overseas voters, as defined by the Uniformed and


Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, are stationed or other


locations authorized in writing by the Secretary of the State


Election Board.


E. The provisions of this section shall only apply to an


election conducted by a county election board, the State Election


Board or a political subdivision of this state.


F. A notary public who knowingly and intentionally violates the


restrictions and requirements provided in this section, upon


conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable as provided


for in Section 16-110 of this title.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-303 BG 1/19/2025 5:40:47 AM













Req. No. 303 Page 5